District of Columbia statutes.
25-205

Board record-keeping responsibilities.

(a)

The Board shall maintain complete and accurate records of all action taken on:

(1)

Applications for licenses; and

(2)

Recommendations for, and remonstrances against, the granting of licenses.

(b)

The Board shall maintain the records in a manner readily accessible for inspection by the public during normal business hours.

(c)

The Board shall provide to the Director and the Council annual reports detailing the activities of the Board for the previous year regarding the following items:

(1)

Licenses, including the number of licenses outstanding; the number of new alcohol licenses and permits issued; the number of alcohol licenses and permits renewed; the number of licenses suspended; and the number of licenses revoked;

(2)

Enforcement, including the number of regulatory inspections performed and the number of investigations conducted;

(3)

The workload of the Board, including the number of adjudicated cases processed; the number of hearings conducted; and the number of show cause cases pending;

(4)

Community notification efforts, including the number of ANC notifications issued; the number of ANC meetings attended by Board members; and the number of community meetings attended by Board members; and

(5)

Revenue generated by Board actions, including revenue generated by the Board from permits and licenses and from fines.

(d)

The Board shall provide to the office of each ANC, on a quarterly basis, a list of all licenses due to expire during the ensuing 6 months.

History

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 322, ch. 4, § 6
Aug. 27, 1935, 49 Stat. 897, ch. 756, § 2
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-157, §§ 3, 15, 29 DCR 3617
Mar. 8, 1984, D.C. Law 5-51, § 2(b)(2), 30 DCR 5927
Mar. 7, 1987, D.C. Law 6-217, § 3, 34 DCR 907
May 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-122, § 2(c), 41 DCR 1658
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-187, § 101(f), 51 DCR 6525

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 25-205.
1973 Ed., § 25-106.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-187 rewrote subsec. (d) which had read as follows: “(d) The Board shall provide to each ANC office, on a quarterly basis, a list of licenses due to expire in the areas that the ANC will represent during the ensuing 6 months.”